Massachusetts, session 194th, S2490.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 115, Section 5 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting after paragraph 7, the following:-
"The Secretary of Veterans’ Services shall promulgate regulations to reimburse
municipalities for outreach costs by local departments of veterans’ Services to be administered
by veterans’ service officers veterans’ service officers of 75% of all outreach expenses not to
exceed $2,000".
of 1